Utah statutes.
67-5-25.   Litigation Account for Highway Projects.
(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as
the "Litigation Account for Highway Projects."
(2)  The Litigation Account for Highway Projects consists of:
(a)  appropriations made to the restricted account by the Legislature;
(b)  transfers to the restricted account from highway project funds as
approved by the Transportation Commission; and
(c)  any donations made to the restricted account.
(3) (a)  The state treasurer shall invest money in the restricted account
according to Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.
(b)  The Division of Finance shall deposit interest or other earnings derived
from investment of restricted account money into the General Fund.
(4) (a)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the attorney general shall use
money from the account to pay litigation expenses for defending legal actions
filed against the state that challenge highway projects.
(b)  The Legislature intends that money in the account be appropriated for a
project's litigation expenses before appropriating funds for litigation
expenses from any other source.
(5)  The Division of Finance shall:
(a)  establish subaccounts within the restricted account to hold money
appropriated by the Legislature for litigation expenses for different highway
projects; and
(b)  apportion donations received equally among subaccounts unless the donor
directs that the donation:
(i)  be used to defend a specific legal action; or
(ii)  be deposited into a specific subaccount.
(6)  When some or all of the money appropriated to fund litigation expenses
for a particular highway project is not expended, the Legislature shall return
the money to the donor.
